Washington statutes.
RCW 13.80.050

Evaluation.

The department shall periodically evaluate the program including but not limited to providing data on the youth served, the type and extent of court involvement, the type of services provided, the length of stay of each student in the program, the academic progress of the youth, the recidivism rate, and rates of employment and enrollment in postsecondary education.

[ 1994 c 152 s 5.]